tests/numerals/numerals.yaml
  "px numbers in acc":
    1<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "1-ен"
    2<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "2-сен"
    3<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "3-ен"
    4<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "4-ен"
    5<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "5-ен"
    6<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "6-сын"
    7<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "7-сен"
    8<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "8-ен"
    9<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "9-ын"
    10<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "10-ын"
    11<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "11-ен"
    12<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "12-сен"
    13<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "13-ен"
    14<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "14-ен"
    15<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "15-ен"
    16<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "16-сын"
    17<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "17-сен"
    18<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "18-ен"
    19<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "19-ын"
    20<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "20-сын"
    21<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "21-ен"
    22<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "22-сен"
    23<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "23-ен"
    24<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "24-ен"
    25<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "25-ен"
    26<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "26-сын"
    27<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "27-сен"
    28<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "28-ен"
    29<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "29-ын"
    30<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "30-ын"
    31<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "31-ен"
    32<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "32-сен"
    33<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "33-ен"
    34<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "34-ен"
    35<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "35-ен"
    36<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "36-сын"
    37<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "37-сен"
    38<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "38-ен"
    39<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "39-ын"
    40<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "40-ын"
    41<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "41-ен"
    42<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "42-сен"
    43<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "43-ен"
    44<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "44-ен"
    45<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "45-ен"
    46<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "46-сын"
    47<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "47-сен"
    48<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "48-ен"
    49<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "49-ын"
    50<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "50-ен"
    51<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "51-ен"
    52<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "52-сен"
    53<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "53-ен"
    54<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "54-ен"
    55<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "55-ен"
    56<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "56-сын"
    57<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "57-сен"
    58<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "58-ен"
    59<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "59-ын"
    60<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "60-ын"
    61<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "61-ен"
    62<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "62-сен"
    63<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "63-ен"
    64<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "64-ен"
    65<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "65-ен"
    66<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "66-сын"
    67<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "67-сен"
    68<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "68-ен"
    69<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "69-ын"
    70<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "70-ен"
    71<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "71-ен"
    72<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "72-сен"
    73<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "73-ен"
    74<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "74-ен"
    75<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "75-ен"
    76<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "76-сын"
    77<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "77-сен"
    78<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "78-ен"
    79<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "79-ын"
    80<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "80-ен"
    81<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "81-ен"
    82<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "82-сен"
    83<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "83-ен"
    84<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "84-ен"
    85<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "85-ен"
    86<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "86-сын"
    87<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "87-сен"
    88<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "88-ен"
    89<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "89-ын"
    90<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "90-ын"
    91<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "91-ен"
    92<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "92-сен"
    93<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "93-ен"
    94<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "94-ен"
    95<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "95-ен"
    96<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "96-сын"
    97<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "97-сен"
    98<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "98-ен"
    99<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "99-ын"
    100<num><subst><px3sp><acc> : "100-ен"


  "px numbers in abl":
    1<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "1-еннән"
    2<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "2-сеннән"
    3<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "3-еннән"
    4<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "4-еннән"
    5<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "5-еннән"
    6<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "6-сыннан"
    7<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "7-сеннән"
    8<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "8-еннән"
    9<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "9-ыннан"
    10<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "10-ыннан"
    11<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "11-еннән"
    12<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "12-сеннән"
    13<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "13-еннән"
    14<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "14-еннән"
    15<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "15-еннән"
    16<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "16-сыннан"
    17<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "17-сеннән"
    18<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "18-еннән"
    19<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "19-ыннан"
    20<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "20-сыннан"
    21<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "21-еннән"
    22<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "22-сеннән"
    23<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "23-еннән"
    24<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "24-еннән"
    25<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "25-еннән"
    26<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "26-сыннан"
    27<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "27-сеннән"
    28<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "28-еннән"
    29<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "29-ыннан"
    30<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "30-ыннан"
    31<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "31-еннән"
    32<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "32-сеннән"
    33<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "33-еннән"
    34<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "34-еннән"
    35<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "35-еннән"
    36<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "36-сыннан"
    37<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "37-сеннән"
    38<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "38-еннән"
    39<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "39-ыннан"
    40<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "40-ыннан"
    41<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "41-еннән"
    42<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "42-сеннән"
    43<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "43-еннән"
    44<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "44-еннән"
    45<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "45-еннән"
    46<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "46-сыннан"
    47<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "47-сеннән"
    48<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "48-еннән"
    49<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "49-ыннан"
    50<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "50-еннән"
    51<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "51-еннән"
    52<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "52-сеннән"
    53<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "53-еннән"
    54<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "54-еннән"
    55<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "55-еннән"
    56<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "56-сыннан"
    57<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "57-сеннән"
    58<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "58-еннән"
    59<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "59-ыннан"
    60<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "60-ыннан"
    61<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "61-еннән"
    62<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "62-сеннән"
    63<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "63-еннән"
    64<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "64-еннән"
    65<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "65-еннән"
    66<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "66-сыннан"
    67<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "67-сеннән"
    68<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "68-еннән"
    69<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "69-ыннан"
    70<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "70-еннән"
    71<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "71-еннән"
    72<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "72-сеннән"
    73<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "73-еннән"
    74<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "74-еннән"
    75<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "75-еннән"
    76<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "76-сыннан"
    77<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "77-сеннән"
    78<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "78-еннән"
    79<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "79-ыннан"
    80<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "80-еннән"
    81<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "81-еннән"
    82<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "82-сеннән"
    83<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "83-еннән"
    84<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "84-еннән"
    85<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "85-еннән"
    86<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "86-сыннан"
    87<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "87-сеннән"
    88<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "88-еннән"
    89<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "89-ыннан"
    90<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "90-ыннан"
    91<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "91-еннән"
    92<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "92-сеннән"
    93<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "93-еннән"
    94<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "94-еннән"
    95<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "95-еннән"
    96<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "96-сыннан"
    97<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "97-сеннән"
    98<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "98-еннән"
    99<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "99-ыннан"
    100<num><subst><px3sp><abl> : "100-еннән"
